Hawaii statutes.
§612-21 Jurors disqualified, exempted, or
excused. Whenever a juror has been disqualified, exempted, or excused,
that fact shall be noted, and the juror shall not be subject to service for the
period of time commensurate with the nature and circumstances of the juror's
disqualification, exemption, or excuse. [L 1973, c 191, pt of §1; gen ch 1993;
am L 2007, c 122, §15]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next